Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.060

Penalties.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person violating the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 103; 1965 c 61 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.